California statutes. Insurance Code
The commissioner shall make an examination of the books and records of the applicant. The costs and expenses of the examination shall be paid by the commissioner out of funds appropriated for support of the Department of Insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2048.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.76.

Upon failure of the applicant to pay the expense of publication of notice within 30 days after the presentation of the bill therefor, the commissioner shall collect the costs out of the deposited securities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2048.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.77.

If the commissioner is satisfied from the application and the examination of the books and records of the applicant that the applicant has, in fact, complied with the representations made in his application, the commissioner shall deliver to the applicant the securities deposited; provided, however, the commissioner shall not deliver the securities to the applicant prior to the expiration of three years after the latest date on which a bond was issued or written by the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2048.)
-------------------------------------------

1803.

A bail solicitor’s license, by its terms, permits the licensee to transact bail on behalf of and as the employee of the holder of the bail licenses therein designated while there is in effect and on file with the commissioner an unrevoked appointment of the solicitor by such license holder. In all matters respecting the transaction of bail, it shall be conclusively presumed that such solicitor acted on behalf of and pursuant to the instructions of the appointing license holder. A bail solicitor’s license shall not be issued until there is filed with the commissioner an appointment of such solicitor, effective upon issue of the license executed by the holder of a bail agent’s
 license or bail permittee’s license, or both such licenses. Such appointment shall state that the license holder appoints the solicitor and will employ him in the transaction of bail, until notice is filed with the commissioner revoking the appointment. Such appointment and license shall permit the bail solicitor to transact only the undertakings of bail or bail bonds which the license or licenses of the appointing license holder permits such license holder to transact.

Before the issuance of a bail solicitor’s license, the applicant shall file a bond in the penal sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) conditioned upon the proper application and disposal of all moneys collected or received by the solicitor, in favor of the people of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 55.)
-------------------------------------------

1804.

An applicant for bail license shall file with the commissioner an application in such form and having such supporting documents as the commissioner prescribes, except that the application shall be verified in the manner provided for verification of complaints in civil cases. The commissioner shall investigate the licensees in such manner and in respect to such matters as he deems advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 654.)
-------------------------------------------

1805.

The commissioner may decline to issue a bail license until he is satisfied that:

(a) The applicant is of good business reputation and of good general reputation.

(b) That the applicant has never been refused a license or had a license revoked by any public authority for reasons which indicated lack of honesty or integrity, or which show improper business practice on the part of the applicant.

(c) That the applicant has an understanding of the obligations and duties of bail.

(d) That the applicant has not participated in or been connected with any business transaction which, in the opinion of the commissioner tends to show unfitness to act in a fiduciary capacity or to maintain the standards of fairness and honesty required of a trustee or other fiduciary.

(e) That the applicant has not willfully misstated any material fact in his application or procured a misstatement in the supporting documents thereof.

(f) That there is no outstanding judgment against the applicant of conviction of a misdemeanor or felony denounced by this code, or one of the elements of which involves a misappropriation of money or property.

(g) That the applicant has not committed an act forbidden by this code.

(h) That the applicant is a fit and proper person to hold the license applied for.

(i) The applicant has been a continuous resident of the State of California for at least two years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 228.)
-------------------------------------------

1806.

The commissioner may suspend, revoke or refuse to issue any license under this chapter whenever it is made to appear to him that the holder of such permit is not a fit or proper person to be permitted to continue to hold or receive such license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 654.)
-------------------------------------------

1807.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke any bail license for any cause for which he could deny such license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 654.)
-------------------------------------------

1807.5.

Except as provided in Sections 1669 and 1738, the commissioner shall not deny, suspend, or revoke any license, issued under this article, without first granting a hearing, upon reasonable notice to the applicant or licensee, except that he may temporarily suspend a license for a period not exceeding 15 days pending the hearing. Where a hearing is held under this section the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted pursuant to that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 304, Sec. 10.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1807.7.

Commencing on January 1, 2011, all licenses issued pursuant to this article shall be for a license term of two years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 400, Sec. 20.   (AB 2782)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1807.8.

“License term” as used in this chapter means all of that two-year period beginning as described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 1807.9, as applicable, and ending on the day two years after the last calendar day of the month in which the initial license was issued. Licenses issued prior to January 1, 2011, shall expire on June 30 of each odd-numbered year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 400, Sec. 21.   (AB 2782)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1807.9.

“License year” as used in this chapter shall be determined for each individual and entity as follows:

(a) Upon initial licensing, the license year starts on the date the license is issued.

(b) Subsequently, each license year starts the first day of the month following the month in which the initial license was issued.

(c) A license year ends the following calendar year on the last calendar day of the month in which the initial license was issued.

(d) A license year for licenses issued prior to January 1, 2011, starts on July 1 and ends on June 30.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 400, Sec. 22.   (AB 2782)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.

(a) Applications for renewal of licenses may be filed on or before the expiration date upon payment of the fees for filing specified in Section 1811.

(b) Upon failure to file the application as provided in subdivision (a), the license shall expire on the first day of the next month, but the holder may file an application for a new license.
 Until that same month and day of the next succeeding year the fee shall be twice that specified in Section 1811 for the filing.

(c) No application shall be deemed filed within the meaning of this section unless the document itself has been actually delivered to, and the proper fee for its filing has been paid at, the office of the commissioner during office hours, or unless both the document and the fee have been filed and remitted pursuant to Sections 11002 and 11003 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 400, Sec. 23.   (AB 2782)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1809.

The provisions of law relating to unlawful rebates shall not apply to commissions or other consideration paid or exchanged between licensees under this chapter, except that in such case the licensee who executes the undertaking or executes or delivers the bail bond shall, in all matters in respect thereto, be deemed the principal and all licensees otherwise connected with the transaction shall be deemed his agents in respect thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 361.)
-------------------------------------------

1810.

(a) Natural persons can be licensed under this chapter.

(b) A license may be held by a corporation, in which case all of the following requirements shall be met:

(1) The application shall set forth the names of all officers and employees of the licensee who will be authorized to exercise the powers of the licensee under this chapter. Each of those persons shall be required to meet the requirements for licensure under
 this chapter, and disciplinary action may be taken against any of those persons, and the licensee, if any of those persons does any act that would be grounds for disciplinary action against a licensee.

(2) The corporation may solicit or negotiate the execution or delivery of bail on behalf of surety insurers only through natural persons who hold individual licenses as bail agents.

(3) One hundred percent of the shares of the corporation shall be held by licensed bail agents.

(4) All shareholders, officers, and directors of the corporation shall be licensed bail agents, and shall be disclosed to the department.

(5) Any sale or transfer of stock or other interest in the corporation shall require the prior approval of the department. The department shall
 approve or disapprove a request for approval within 60 days of receiving the completed request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 628, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1810.5.

The commissioner shall not issue a bail license to any person unless and until the applicant takes and passes an examination given by the commissioner as provided in this chapter. This prohibition shall not apply with respect to persons who were licensed under this chapter during any part of the annual period terminating on the July 1st preceding the time to be covered by the license applied for.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 381.)
-------------------------------------------

1810.6.

The commissioner shall conduct or arrange for written examination to be given at least twice a year upon questions proposed by the commissioner as to the qualifications of applicants to hold a bail license. The examination shall be of sufficient scope to satisfy the commissioner that the applicants have knowledge of, and are reasonably familiar with, the laws of this State relating to the giving of bail and the execution and delivery of undertakings of bail, and have a general and fair understanding of the obligations and duties of the holder of a bail license in respect to the conduct of business under each type of bail license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 361.)
-------------------------------------------

1810.7.

(a) In order to be eligible to take the examination required to be licensed under this chapter, the applicant shall have completed the following:

(1) A minimum of 20 hours of classroom education in subjects pertinent to the duties and responsibilities of a bail licensee, including, but not limited to, all related laws and regulations, rights of the accused, ethics, and apprehension of bail fugitives.

(2) (A) A 40-hour power of arrest course certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training pursuant to Section 832 of the Penal Code. Completion of the course shall be for
 educational purposes only and not intended to confer the power of arrest of a peace officer or public officer, or agent of any federal, state, or local government, unless the person is so employed by a governmental agency.

(B) This paragraph shall apply to both of the following:

(i) A bail fugitive recovery agent, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1299.01 of the Penal Code.

(ii) A bail, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1299.01 of the Penal Code, who hires, trains, or designates assignments for bail fugitive recovery agents.

(b) The commissioner shall approve or disapprove an applicant to provide education for
 licensure as required by this section within 90 days of receipt of the applicant’s full and complete application. However, this 90-day period shall be tolled during the pendency of any investigation of the applicant by the commissioner for an alleged violation that would, if proven, result in the suspension, revocation, or denial of the provider’s approval to provide continuing education to bail agents as prescribed in Section 1813. Failure to disapprove an applicant within this period shall result in the automatic approval of the application. Approval shall be valid for two years. The commissioner may, at any time, disapprove any provider who is not qualified or whose course outlines are not approved, who is not of good business reputation, or who is lacking in integrity, honesty, or competency. A provider shall not provide education for licensure following the expiration of the two-year approval
 period unless the commissioner has renewed the provider’s approval. The commissioner shall, at the time of renewal, approve or disapprove the course outlines and schedule of classes to be provided.

(c) Providers responsible for providing education for licensure under this chapter shall consult with the California State Sheriffs’ Association, the California District Attorneys Association, and the County Counsels’ Association of California prior to submission of the course outlines for approval by the commissioner, and these entities may respond within 30 days of receipt of a request for consultation from a provider. Providers shall maintain records of their requests for consultation and any responses from these entities, and make these records available to the department for review as requested. The bail license fee shall be increased,
 the amount of which shall be determined by the commissioner, which shall be deposited in the Insurance Fund for the purposes of recovering the administrative costs for meeting the conditions and purposes of this section. Providers of education or continuing education shall offer courses to all applicants at the same course fees.

(d) Any person who falsely represents to the commissioner that compliance with this section has been met shall be subject, after notice and hearing, to the penalties and fines set out in Section 1814.

(e) A licensee shall additionally complete in each two-year license term not less than 12 hours of continuing education in the subjects stated in subdivision (a) prior to renewal of the licensee’s license.

(f) A licensee shall not be required to comply with the continuing education requirements of this section if the licensee submits proof satisfactory to the commissioner that the licensee has been a licensee in good standing for 30 continuous years in this state and is 70 years of age or older.

(g) The commissioner may make reasonable rules and regulations necessary, advisable, and convenient for the administration and enforcement of this chapter. The rules and regulations may include a schedule establishing fees to be paid by an applicant seeking approval to act as a provider and to deliver courses under this section. Those fees shall be in an amount no greater than fees paid by applicants providing similar courses to other insurance agents licensed by the department, as specified in Section 1751.1.

(h) Nothing in this chapter shall preclude completion of the bail agent or bail fugitive recovery agent continuing education requirements of this section through a course of instruction offered via the internet or correspondence. However, this subdivision shall not be construed to allow completion of the prelicensing education requirements of this section through a course of instruction.

(i) Successful completion of the continuing education requirements by means of an internet or correspondence course shall require obtaining a passing grade of at least 70 percent on a written final examination. The final examination shall be open book and shall be graded by the approved provider. The provider shall issue certificates of completion only to those students who have passed the final
 examination.

(j) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 10) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 768, Sec. 11.   (AB 2043)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1810.8.

(a) The commissioner may issue a temporary license to the executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased holder of a bail agent’s license, bail permittee’s license, or bail fugitive recovery agent’s license, permitting such party to act as such representative to exercise the rights and privileges of such a licenseholder for the purpose of conducting the business of the estate for a period of one year from and after the date of the death, pending, but not after, the disposal of the business.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 12) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 768, Sec. 13.   (AB 2043)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1810.9.

A renewal license shall be issued by the commissioner to a licensee upon proof of current licensure, payment of a renewal fee, and completion of the continuing education requirements as required by subdivision (a) of Section 1810.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 515, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1811.

For the commissioner’s services in connection with the filing of any application or request for any license under this chapter, the commissioner shall charge and collect the following fees:

(a) For filing an application or request for bail agent’s license, three hundred eleven dollars ($311) per year.

(b) For filing an application or request for bail solicitor’s license, three hundred eleven dollars ($311) per year.

(c) For filing an application or request for bail permittee’s license, six hundred twenty-four dollars ($624).

(d) For filing an application or request for bail fugitive recovery agent’s license, three hundred eleven dollars ($311) per year.

(e) For filing an application for examination, or reexamination, sixty-two dollars ($62).

(f) For a renewal application, a fee of ninety-four dollars ($94) per year. In the case of a bail agent with more than one valid notice of appointment on file, the fee to be charged pursuant to this subdivision shall be the fee provided herein multiplied by the number of insurers whose valid appointments are on file on the date the document is filed unless the bail agent in that document advises the commissioner of the agent’s intent to terminate the appointment of one or more of those insurers, in which event the fee shall be based upon the number
 of insurers remaining.

(g) For a bail solicitor’s renewal application, a fee of ninety-four dollars ($94) per year.

(h) For a bail permittee’s renewal application, a fee of three hundred ninety-four dollars ($394) per year.

(i) For a bail fugitive recovery agent’s renewal application, a fee of ninety-four dollars ($94) per year.

(j) At the time of filing an application for a license, if a qualifying examination is required for issue or in connection with the license, the fee for filing the first application to take the qualifying examination shall be paid at the time of filing application for the license.

(k) For filing application or request for approval of a true or fictitious name pursuant to Section 1724.5, thirty-two dollars ($32), except that there shall be no fee when the name is contained in an original application.

(l) For filing a bond required by this chapter, except when the bond constitutes part of an original application, twenty-eight dollars ($28).

(m) For filing a first amendment to an application, fifteen dollars ($15).

(n) For filing a second and each subsequent amendment to an application, thirty-two dollars ($32).

(o) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 14) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 768, Sec. 15.   (AB 2043)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1812.

The commissioner may make reasonable rules necessary, advisable, or convenient for the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 654.)
-------------------------------------------

1813.

The commissioner, after notice and hearing, in accordance with the procedure provided in Article 13 (commencing with Section 1737) of Chapter 5 may suspend, revoke, or deny any license or certificate of authority issued pursuant to any provision of this code whenever he or she finds that the holder thereof has violated any provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 104.)
-------------------------------------------

1814.

The violation of any foregoing provision of this chapter, or of any rule of the commissioner made pursuant thereto, is a public offense, punishable by fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in the county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 211.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1815.

(a) The commissioner shall publish and maintain a list of the names of holders of bail agents’ and bail permittees’ licenses and their solicitors and bail fugitive recovery agents’ licenses on the department’s public internet website, together with their license numbers and any other information with respect to the persons as the commissioner considers advisable. The commissioner shall promptly upon termination, for any cause, of any license, update the department’s public internet website.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2023.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 16) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 768, Sec. 17.   (AB 2043)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1819.

The certificate of the commissioner certifying any facts found after hearing held under this chapter shall be prima facie evidence of the facts set forth therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 361.)
-------------------------------------------

1820.

Every bail license shall be prominently displayed in the office of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 361.)
-------------------------------------------

1821.

(a) A license shall not be refused by the commissioner without proceedings in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, being initiated within 60 days from the date of filing the completed application.

(b) Sections 1724.5, 1733, 1734, 1735 and Articles 6 (commencing with Section 1666) and 13 (commencing with Section 1737) of Chapter 5 apply to persons licensed under this chapter, and “insurance agent” or “licensee”, as used in those provisions, include persons licensed under this chapter.

(c) Subdivisions
 (a), (c), (e), (f), (g), and (h) of Section 1725.5 apply to persons licensed under this chapter, and “person” or “licensee,” as used in those provisions, include persons licensed under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 11.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1822.

A licensee or applicant for a license under this chapter shall notify the commissioner, in writing, of any change in the address from which he intends to conduct his business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 671.)
-------------------------------------------

1823.

All surety companies which execute undertakings of bail shall keep any moneys collected from agents licensed pursuant to this code as buildup or reserve funds in segregated trust accounts within the state. These accounts shall be maintained as any of the following:

(a) A Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC) insured account.

(b) United States government bonds and treasury certificates or other obligations for which the faith of the
 United States is pledged for the payment of principal and interest.

(c) Repurchase agreements collateralized by securities issued by the United States government.

(d) A money market fund that limits its portfolio to those securities listed in subdivisions (a) and (b). 

The accounts described in this section shall not be hypothecated or offered as collateral.

The accounts described in this section shall be used to satisfy the unfulfilled obligations of the undertakings of bail written by the agents from whom the moneys have been collected and to otherwise satisfy the unfulfilled obligations which may be owing to the surety by those agents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 141, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Life and Disability Insurance Analysts [1831. - 1849.]

1831.

The following persons are exempt from this chapter:

(a) Active members of the State Bar of California.

(b) Any person who has passed all of the qualifying examinations necessary to become an associate of the Society of Actuaries.

(c) An officer or employee of any bank or trust company who receives no compensation from sources other than the bank or trust company for activities connected with his employment which would otherwise subject him to this chapter. 

(d) Any person employed by an employer who on behalf of his or her employer or any employee of his or her employer transacts life or disability insurance with, but not on behalf of, an insurer; or,

Advises his or her employer or any employee of his or her employer in any manner concerning life or disability insurance; if:

(1) The employer receives no compensation by reason of such transactions or advice; and

(2) Such person receives no compensation from any source other than his or her employer for such transactions and advice.

(e) An investment advisor, as defined in Section 25009 of the Corporations Code, when acting in that capacity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 962, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1832.

An employee or officer of any insurer is not eligible for license as a life and disability insurance analyst. A life insurer shall not pay a life and disability insurance analyst any commission directly or indirectly, on any life or disability insurance transacted by and in the capacity as a life and disability insurance analyst.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 962, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1833.

A license to act as life insurance analyst shall not be issued to any person not residing in this state, nor to any person who is under 18 years of age at the time of application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1748.)
-------------------------------------------

1834.

Such license shall be obtained only on a written application on a form prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner may decline to act upon an incomplete or defective application until amendments or an amended application are filed with him which complete the prescribed form and are properly executed. He may prescribe the form of such amendments or amended application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1835.

The applicant shall answer under oath such interrogatories as the commissioner himself or through his deputies propounds on forms prepared by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1836.

A license shall not be issued until the commissioner has satisfied himself upon evidence presented and recorded as to the integrity of the applicant and that the applicant:

(a) Is of good business reputation and of good general reputation.

(b) Has a thorough knowledge of life or disability insurance.

(c) Has not participated in or been connected with any business transaction which, in the opinion of the commissioner, tends to show unfitness to act in a fiduciary capacity or to maintain the standards of fairness and honesty required of a trustee or other fiduciary.

(d) Has not willfully misstated any material fact in an application to the commissioner for a license or in a document filed in support of such an application, and has not obtained his or her license by concealment or knowing misrepresentation.

(e) Is a fit and proper person to hold the license applied for.

(f) Does not seek the license for the purpose of avoiding or preventing the operation or enforcement of the insurance laws of this state.

(g) Has within 12 months preceding issuance of the license taken and passed the qualification examination provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 962, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1837.

The commissioner may decline to issue a license if an applicant:

(a) Has been refused a license or had a license revoked by any public authority for reasons which indicated lack of honesty or integrity or which showed improper business practice on the part of the applicant.

(b) Has been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony denounced by this code or one of the elements of which involved the misappropriation of money or property. 

(c) Has committed an act forbidden by this code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1887 by Stats. 1959, Ch. 753.)
-------------------------------------------

1838.

A license shall not be refused by the commissioner on the basis of Section 1836, excepting subdivision (g), without hearing on notice to the applicant. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 962, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1839.

The commissioner shall conduct or arrange for a written examination, to be given at least twice a year upon questions prepared by the commissioner, as to the qualifications of the applicant to act as a life and disability insurance analyst.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 962, Sec. 7.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1840.

The examination shall be of sufficient scope to satisfy the commissioner that the applicant has sufficient knowledge of and is thoroughly familiar with the life and disability insurance laws of this state, and the provisions, terms, and conditions of life and disability insurance contracts written on residents of this state, and has a thorough and complete knowledge of life and disability insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 962, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1841.

Every individual and organization licensee, and every applicant for such a license, under this chapter shall file with the commissioner in writing the true name of the individual or organization, and also all fictitious names under which he or she conducts or intends to conduct his or her business, and after licensing shall file with the commissioner any change in or discontinuance of those names. The commissioner may, in writing, disapprove the use of any true or fictitious name (other than the bona fide natural name of an individual) by any licensee on any ground set forth in Section 1724.5. A licensee may not use a true or fictitious name after being notified by the commissioner in writing that the use is contrary to this section. If the commissioner determines that there are facts in mitigation in connection with the continued use of the name, the commissioner may permit its use for a specified reasonable period of time if, in connection therewith, he or she imposes such conditions as will protect the public and achieve the purposes of this section. Any such permission, and any such conditions, shall be in writing.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 962, Sec. 9.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1842.

(a) The provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) concerning the license period and the procedure and time for filing applications for renewal of licenses and for filing notices of intention to keep licenses in force applicable to life agents are applicable to licenses authorized by this chapter except that participation in the applications or notices by an admitted insurer is not required.

(b) The fee for filing an application for the issuance or renewal of a license to act as a life and disability insurance analyst or a notice of intention to keep the license in force is two hundred eighty-three dollars ($283). As respects life and disability insurance analysts all references in Section 1718 to fees shall be
 deemed to be this fee. The fee for filing application to take the qualifying examination for life and disability insurance analyst is one hundred forty-one dollars ($141) and the fee for filing the first application to take the qualifying examination must be paid at the same time the application for issuance of the license is paid. The fees specified in this section shall be paid in advance, and shall be determined by multiplying the number of natural persons to be licensed, or to be named on or added to a license, by the amounts specified in this section as to each license, multiplied by the number of license years in the period of the license applied for, or the remaining period of the existing license counting any initial fractional license year of the period as one year for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 50.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1842.1.

(a) An organization may hold a license to act as a life and disability insurance analyst. An organization is not eligible for license under this chapter if its articles of incorporation or association or agreement of copartnership forbid it to act in the capacity for which a license is sought.

(b) Only the following natural persons are eligible to be named under an organizational license under this chapter:

(1) Any general partner or employee of a copartnership.

(2) Any member, officer, or employee of an association.

(3) Any officer or employee of the corporation.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, whenever reference is made in this chapter to an applicant for a license, the reference includes each natural person who applies to be named on the license of an organization, and wherever reference is made to a person that has been licensed, that reference shall also apply to a person named to act in such capacity under the license of an organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 962, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

1843.

The provisions of Sections 780, 781, 782 and 784, Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 790) of Chapter 2, and Article 13 (commencing with Section 1737) of Chapter 5 are applicable to licensees and applicants for license under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 962, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

1844.

Any person who acts, offers to act, or assumes to act, as a life and disability insurance analyst when not licensed by the commissioner as provided by this article, or after the license granted to him or her has been suspended or revoked, unless proceedings are pending in the courts to review the act of the commissioner, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 962, Sec. 12.3.)
-------------------------------------------

1845.

Any person who acts, offers to act or assumes to act as a life and disability insurance analyst in violation of Section 1844 is guilty of a public nuisance and may be enjoined from so doing pursuant to Section 12928.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 962, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1846.

A licensee or applicant for a license under this article shall notify the commissioner, in writing, of any changes in the address from which he intends to conduct his business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1848.

A person licensed pursuant to this chapter shall not charge a fee for any service which is customarily associated with the solicitation of insurance sales or the servicing of insurance contracts written by the licensee or contracts for which the licensee is receiving compensation from the insurer. A licensee shall not receive any fee unless that fee is based upon a written agreement signed by the party to be charged.

The agreement shall include a statement that information and services concerning insurance policies may be obtained directly from the insurer without cost, a statement outlining the services to be performed for which a fee is to be charged, and the fee to be charged. Additionally, if the licensee is also licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621), there shall be a statement in the agreement indicating that the licensee is so licensed and, as such, receives commissions for the sale of products. A copy of every such agreement shall be retained by the licensee for not less than three years after the services have been fully performed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 962, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

1849.

The department may, from time to time, publish rules and regulations regarding the initial and continuing qualifications to obtain the life and disability insurance analyst license. No person shall be eligible for a life and disability insurance analyst license unless for five years preceding the date of the examination, he or she has been licensed as both a life-only and accident and health licensee pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1626.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 300, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Rates and Rating and Other Organizations [1850.4. - 1861.16.]



  ARTICLE 1. Purpose and Scope of Chapter [1850.4. - 1851.1.]

1850.4.
